Massachusetts, session 194th, S789.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
2 section 33 the following section:- Section 34. (a) For the purpose of this section, the term “doula
3 services” shall have the following meaning:
4 “Doula Services” are physical, emotional, and informational support, but not medical
5 care, provided by trained doulas to individuals and families from conception until twelve months
6 after pregnancy, labor, childbirth, adoption, miscarriage, stillbirth or abortion. Doula services
7 include but are not limited to: (1) continuous labor and delivery support, inclusive of all
8 outcomes; (2) support for pregnancy loss or infant loss, including bereavement home or in-
9 person visits; (3) accompanying individuals to health care and social services appointments; (4)
10 connecting individuals to community-based and state- and federally-funded resources, including
1 of 10

11 those which address social determinants of health; (5) being on-call around the time of birth,
12 adoption, loss or abortion, as well as providing on-call support in-person or via telehealth for
13 individuals’ questions or concerns; (6) support for other individuals providing care for a birthing
14 or adoptive parent, including spouses, partners, and other family members. (7) educational and
15 informational support including but not limited to childbirth preparation, newborn care, perinatal
16 mental health, and postpartum recovery. (8) empowering individuals to advocate for their
17 preferences, needs and rights during pregnancy, labor and delivery, and postpartum.
18 (b) Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of the
19 commonwealth and their dependents insured under the group insurance commission (hereinafter
20 “policy”) shall provide coverage for all doula services. Coverage provided for doula services
21 shall not be subject to any deductible, coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing
22 requirement. (c) No policy shall require a referral for doula services by any other health care
23 provider as a condition of reimbursement. (d) Doulas shall be reimbursed for their services at a
24 rate at least equivalent to MassHealth’s reimbursement rate for doula services. (e) A policy shall
25 cover, without prior authorization, a minimum of twenty hours of prenatal and postpartum doula
26 services per pregnancy, and continuous support throughout labor and delivery, inclusive of all
27 pregnancy outcomes. Within the authorized number of doula hours, policies shall not impose
28 limitations on the amount of time a doula can bill per patient per day. (f) Policies must establish
29 a process to approve coverage of additional hours of doula services in cases where the patient has
30 heightened risk or need. (g) Policies shall follow the doula credentialing requirements developed
31 by the Massachusetts Department of Public Health, and may not impose any additional
32 credentialing requirements. Additionally, any doula approved as a MassHealth Doula Provider
33 shall be deemed as meeting all credentialing requirements.
2 of 10

34 SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
35 inserting after section 47UU the following section:- SECTION 47VV. (a) For the purpose of this
36 section, the term “doula services” shall have the following meaning: “Doula Services” are
37 physical, emotional, and informational support, but not medical care, provided by trained doulas
38 to individuals and families from conception until twelve months after pregnancy, labor,
39 childbirth, adoption, miscarriage, stillbirth or abortion. Doula services include but are not limited
40 to: (1) continuous labor and delivery support, inclusive of all outcomes; (2) support for
41 pregnancy loss or infant loss, including bereavement home or in-person visits; (3) accompanying
42 individuals to health care and social services appointments; (4) connecting individuals to
43 community-based and state- and federally-funded resources, including those which address
44 social determinants of health; (5) being on-call around the time of birth, adoption, loss or
45 abortion, as well as providing on-call support in-person or via telehealth for individuals’
46 questions or concerns; (6) support for other individuals providing care for a birthing or adoptive
47 parent, including spouses, partners, and other family members.
48 (7) educational and informational support including but not limited to childbirth
49 preparation, newborn care, perinatal mental health, and postpartum recovery. (8) empowering
50 individuals to advocate for their preferences, needs and rights during pregnancy, labor and
51 delivery, and postpartum. (b) A policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance
52 issued, delivered or renewed within the commonwealth (hereinafter “policy”) shall provide
53 coverage for all doula services. Coverage provided under this section for doula services shall not
54 be subject to any deductible, coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement. (c)
55 No policy shall require a referral for doula services by any other health care provider as a
56 condition of reimbursement. (d) Doulas shall be reimbursed for their services at a rate at least
3 of 10

57 equivalent to MassHealth’s reimbursement rate for doula services. (e) A policy shall cover,
58 without prior authorization, a minimum of twenty hours of prenatal and postpartum doula
59 services per pregnancy, and continuous support throughout labor and delivery, inclusive of all
60 pregnancy outcomes. Within the authorized number of doula hours, policies shall not impose
61 limitations on the amount of time a doula can bill per patient per day. (f) Policies must establish
62 a process to approve coverage of additional hours of doula services in cases where the patient has
63 heightened risk or need.
64 (g) Policies shall follow the doula credentialing requirements developed by the
65 Massachusetts Department of Public Health, and may not impose any additional credentialing
66 requirements. Additionally, any doula approved as a MassHealth Doula Provider shall be
67 deemed as meeting all credentialing requirements.
68 SECTION 3. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
69 section 8VV the following section:- SECTION 8WW. (a) For the purpose of this section, the
70 term “doula services” shall have the following meaning: “Doula Services” are physical,
71 emotional, and informational support, but not medical care, provided by trained doulas to
72 individuals and families from conception until twelve months after pregnancy, labor, childbirth,
73 adoption, miscarriage, stillbirth or abortion. Doula services include but are not limited to: (1)
74 continuous labor and delivery support, inclusive of all outcomes; (2) support for pregnancy loss
75 or infant loss, including bereavement home or in-person visits; (3) accompanying individuals to
76 health care and social services appointments; (4) connecting individuals to community-based and
77 state- and federally-funded resources, including those which address social determinants of
78 health;
4 of 10

79 (5) being on-call around the time of birth, adoption, loss or abortion, as well as providing
80 on-call support in-person or via telehealth for individuals’ questions or concerns; (6) support for
81 other individuals providing care for a birthing or adoptive parent, including spouses, partners,
82 and other family members. (7) educational and informational support including but not limited to
83 childbirth preparation, newborn care, perinatal mental health, and postpartum recovery. (8)
84 empowering individuals to advocate for their preferences, needs and rights during pregnancy,
85 labor and delivery, and postpartum. (b) Any contract between a subscriber and a corporation
86 subject to this chapter, pursuant to an individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered,
87 issued or renewed within the commonwealth (hereinafter “policy”) shall provide coverage for all
88 doula services. Coverage provided under this section for doula services shall not be subject to
89 any deductible, coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement. (c) No policy
90 shall require a referral for doula services by any other health care provider as a condition of
91 reimbursement. (d) Doulas shall be reimbursed for their services at a rate at least equivalent to
92 MassHealth’s reimbursement rate for doula services.
93 (e) A policy shall cover, without prior authorization, a minimum of twenty hours of
94 prenatal and postpartum doula services per pregnancy, and continuous support throughout labor
95 and delivery, inclusive of all pregnancy outcomes. Within the authorized number of doula hours,
96 policies shall not impose limitations on the amount of time a doula can bill per patient per day.
97 (f) Policies must establish a process to approve coverage of additional hours of doula services in
98 cases where the patient has heightened risk or need. (g) Policies shall follow the doula
99 credentialing requirements developed by the Massachusetts Department of Public Health, and
100 may not impose any additional credentialing requirements. Additionally, any doula approved as a
101 MassHealth Doula Provider shall be deemed as meeting all credentialing requirements.
5 of 10

102 SECTION 4. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
103 section 4VV the following section:- Section 4WW. (a) For the purpose of this section, the term
104 “doula services” shall have the following meaning: “Doula Services” are physical, emotional,
105 and informational support, but not medical care, provided by trained doulas to individuals and
106 families from conception until twelve months after pregnancy, labor, childbirth, adoption,
107 miscarriage, stillbirth or abortion. Doula services include but are not limited to: (1) continuous
108 labor and delivery support, inclusive of all outcomes;
109 (2) support for pregnancy loss or infant loss, including bereavement home or in-person
110 visits; (3) accompanying individuals to health care and social services appointments; (4)
111 connecting individuals to community-based and state- and federally-funded resources, including
112 those which address social determinants of health; (5) being on-call around the time of birth,
113 adoption, loss or abortion, as well as providing on-call support in-person or via telehealth for
114 individuals’ questions or concerns; (6) support for other individuals providing care for a birthing
115 or adoptive parent, including spouses, partners, and other family members. (7) educational and
116 informational support including but not limited to childbirth preparation, newborn care, perinatal
117 mental health, and postpartum recovery. (8) empowering individuals to advocate for their
118 preferences, needs and rights during pregnancy, labor and delivery, and postpartum. (b) Any
119 subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement that is delivered,
120 issued or renewed within the commonwealth (hereinafter “policy”) shall provide coverage for all
121 doula services. Coverage provided under this section for doula services shall not be subject to
122 any deductible, coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement.
123 (c) No policy shall require a referral for doula services by any other health care provider
124 as a condition of reimbursement. (d) Doulas shall be reimbursed for their services at a rate at
6 of 10

125 least equivalent to MassHealth’s reimbursement rate for doula services. (e) A policy shall cover,
126 without prior authorization, a minimum of twenty hours of prenatal and postpartum doula
127 services per pregnancy, and continuous support throughout labor and delivery, inclusive of all
128 pregnancy outcomes. Within the authorized number of doula hours, policies shall not impose
129 limitations on the amount of time a doula can bill per patient per day. (f) Policies must establish
130 a process to approve coverage of additional hours of doula services in cases where the patient has
131 heightened risk or need. (g) Policies shall follow the doula credentialing requirements developed
132 by the Massachusetts Department of Public Health, and may not impose any additional
133 credentialing requirements. Additionally, any doula approved as a MassHealth Doula Provider
134 shall be deemed as meeting all credentialing requirements.
135 SECTION 5. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
136 section 4NN the following section:- Section 4OO. (a) For the purpose of this section, the term
137 “doula services” shall have the following meaning:
138 “Doula Services” are physical, emotional, and informational support, but not medical
139 care, provided by trained doulas to individuals and families from conception until twelve months
140 after pregnancy, labor, childbirth, adoption, miscarriage, stillbirth or abortion. Doula services
141 include but are not limited to: (1) continuous labor and delivery support, inclusive of all
142 outcomes; (2) support for pregnancy loss or infant loss, including bereavement home or in-
143 person visits; (3) accompanying individuals to health care and social services appointments; (4)
144 connecting individuals to community-based and state- and federally-funded resources, including
145 those which address social determinants of health; (5) being on-call around the time of birth,
146 adoption, loss or abortion, as well as providing on-call support in-person or via telehealth for
147 individuals’ questions or concerns; (6) support for other individuals providing care for a birthing
7 of 10

148 or adoptive parent, including spouses, partners, and other family members. (7) educational and
149 informational support including but not limited to childbirth preparation, newborn care, perinatal
150 mental health, and postpartum recovery. (8) empowering individuals to advocate for their
151 preferences, needs and rights during pregnancy, labor and delivery, and postpartum.
152 (b) Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed within
153 or without the commonwealth (hereinafter “policy”) shall provide coverage for all doula
154 services. Coverage provided under this section for doula services shall not be subject to any
155 deductible, coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement. (c) No policy shall
156 require a referral for doula services by any other health care provider as a condition of
157 reimbursement. (d) Doulas shall be reimbursed for their services at a rate at least equivalent to
158 MassHealth’s reimbursement rate for doula services. (e) A policy shall cover, without prior
159 authorization, a minimum of twenty hours of prenatal and postpartum doula services per
160 pregnancy, and continuous support throughout labor and delivery, inclusive of all pregnancy
161 outcomes. Within the authorized number of doula hours, policies shall not impose limitations on
162 the amount of time a doula can bill per patient per day. (f) Policies must establish a process to
163 approve coverage of additional hours of doula services in cases where the patient has heightened
164 risk or need. (g) Policies shall follow the doula credentialing requirements developed by the
165 Massachusetts Department of Public Health, and may not impose any additional credentialing
166 requirements. Additionally, any doula approved as a MassHealth Doula Provider shall be
167 deemed as meeting all credentialing requirements.
168 SECTION 6. Sections 2 through 6 of this act shall apply to all policies, contracts and
169 certificates of health insurance subject to chapters 32A, chapter 175, chapter 176A, chapter
170 176B, and chapter 176G which are delivered, issued or renewed on or after September 1, 2026.
8 of 10

171 SECTION 7. Doula Advisory Committee: There is hereby created a Doula Advisory Committee.
172 (1) The committee shall consist of 10-12 members to be appointed by the Governor, or designee.
173 (a) All but 2 of the members shall be practicing doulas from the community representing a range
174 of experience levels and a diversity of lived experience; the remaining 2 members shall be
175 individuals from the community who have experienced pregnancy as a MassHealth member and
176 are not practicing doulas. (b) The members of the committee shall represent an equitable
177 geographic distribution from across the Commonwealth, including representation from areas
178 within the Commonwealth where maternal and infant outcomes are worse than the state average,
179 as evidenced by the MA Department of Public Health’s most current perinatal data available at
180 the time the member is appointed. (2) The committee shall be convened within six months of
181 passage of this law. (3) Of the initial appointments to the Doula Advisory Committee, half shall
182 be appointed to a term of 2 years and half shall be appointed to a term of 18 months. Thereafter,
183 all terms shall be 2 years. The Governor, or designee, shall fill vacancies as soon as practicable.
184 (4) At least once every 8 weeks, the Division of Medical Assistance shall meet with the
185 Doula Advisory Committee to consult about MassHealth’s coverage of doula services, including
186 but not limited to the following: (a) the standards and processes around billing for and prompt
187 reimbursement of doula services; (b) establishing grievance procedures for doulas, MassHealth
188 members, and health care providers about MassHealth’s coverage of doula services, the
189 provision of doula services to MassHealth members, and bias that doulas face as they try to
190 integrate into birth teams; (c) maintaining a reimbursement rate for doula services that
191 incentivizes and supports a diverse workforce representative of the communities served, and
192 establishing a recurring timeframe to review that rate in light of inflation and changing costs of
193 living in the commonwealth; (5) Each year, the Doula Advisory Committee must, by a majority
9 of 10

194 vote of a quorum of its members, select an individual to serve as its chairperson for a one year
195 term. The Doula Advisory Committee may replace the chairperson in the same manner mid-
196 term. (6) The Doula Advisory Committee may, by a majority vote of a quorum of its members,
197 reduce the frequency of meetings with MassHealth to less than once every 8 weeks. (7) The
198 Division of Medical Assistance shall seek resources to offer reasonable compensation to
199 members of the Doula Advisory Committee for fulfilling their duties, and shall reimburse
200 members for actual and necessary expenses incurred while fulfilling their duties.
201 SECTION 8. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting in section
202 70E after “Every patient or resident of a facility shall have the right:”: (i) to have their birth
203 doula’s continuous presence during labor and delivery. Facilities shall not place an undue burden
204 on access of a patient’s doula to clinical labor and delivery settings, and shall not arbitrarily
205 exclude a patient’s doula from such settings. A doula shall not be counted as a patient's guest or
206 support person.
10 of 10